Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1230
Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund; created; use; investment; return of grant funds; when required.

(1) The Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund is created. Funding for the grant program described in section 81-1229 shall come from the Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund. The Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund shall receive money pursuant to section 76-903 and may include revenue from appropriations from the Legislature, grants, private contributions, and other sources. Transfers may be made from the fund to the Affordable Housing Trust Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(2) The department shall administer the Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund and may seek additional private or nonstate funds to use in the grant program, including, but not limited to, contributions from the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority and other interested parties.

(3) Interest earned by the department on grant funds shall be applied to the grant program.

(4) If a nonprofit development organization fails to engage in the initial qualified activity within twenty-four months after receiving initial grant funding, the nonprofit development organization shall return the grant funds to the department for credit to the General Fund.

(5) If a nonprofit development organization fails to allocate any remaining initial grant funding on a qualified activity within twenty-four months after engaging in the initial qualified activity, the nonprofit development organization shall return such unallocated grant funds to the department for credit to the Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund.

(6) Beginning July 1, 2032, any funds held by the department in the Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund shall be transferred to the General Fund.

Laws 2017, LB518, § 5;

Laws 2022, LB1069, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB768, § 13;

Laws 2026, LB1067, § 5;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 192.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB768, section 13, with LB1067, section 5, and LB1072, section 192, to reflect all amendments.Changes made by LB768 and LB1067 became effective July 18, 2026. Changes made by LB1072 became operative April 8, 2026.
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.